Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-426
Court-martial; pretrial; trial; procedures applicable.

The pretrial and trial procedures before a court-martial shall be in accordance with the procedures set forth in the Uniform Code of Military Justice of the United States, 10 U.S.C. chapter 47, for courts-martial as the same may be from time to time amended and according to regulations prescribed by the President of the United States as contemplated by such code except as to matters which are specifically covered in the Nebraska Code of Military Justice.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 26, p. 1566;

Laws 1993, LB 170, § 7.